Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-413
Zoning board of appeals; decision; review by district court; procedure.

Any person or persons, jointly or severally aggrieved by any decision of the zoning board of appeals, or any officer, department, board, or bureau of a city of the metropolitan class, may present to the district court a petition, duly verified, setting forth that such decision is illegal, in whole or in part, and specifying the grounds of such illegality. Such petition must be presented to the court within thirty days after the filing of the decision in the office of the zoning board of appeals.

Laws 1925, c. 45, § 8, p. 183;

C.S.1929, § 14-411;

R.S.1943, § 14-413;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 143.

A decision of a zoning board of appeals may be reviewed by a district court, but this section limits the scope of the district court's review to the legality or illegality of the board's decision. Kuhlmann v. City of Omaha, 251 Neb. 176, 556 N.W.2d 15 (1996).

Any person aggrieved by order of zoning board of appeals may file petition in district court setting up the illegality of action of board. Roncka v. Fogarty, 152 Neb. 467, 41 N.W.2d 745 (1950).